Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.231

Prohibited advice and transactions—Exceptions—Rules—Penalty.

(1) A licensee shall not, in conjunction with any professional services performed for compensation under this chapter, provide financial or investment advice to any person other than a family member, represent any person in a real estate transaction, or act as an agent under a power of attorney for any person. However, this section shall not be deemed to prohibit a funeral establishment from entering into prearrangement funeral service contracts in accordance with this chapter or to prohibit a funeral director from providing advice about government or insurance benefits.

(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor and is grounds for disciplinary action.

(3) The board shall adopt rules as the board deems necessary to prevent unethical financial dealings between licensees and their clients.

[ 2005 c 365 s 20; 2003 c 53 s 130; 1986 c 259 s 66; 1982 c 66 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—1982 c 66: See note following RCW 18.39.240.